Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2598.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Fire Chief James W. Cutchall Memorial Highway.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Fayetteville Fire Chief James W. Cutchall was tragically shot and killed on July 2, 1977, when he arrived at the scene of a blaze set by his killer, who then ambushed the responding firefighters.(2) Chief Cutchall was only 33 years of age at the time of his death and was widely regarded as one of the most outstanding fire chiefs in the nation.(3) Chief Cutchall was known for using the following saying in his speeches: "To be a volunteer firefighter and make an error is human. To be a volunteer firefighter and worry about those errors is compassion. To be a volunteer 12345678910111213141516171819 firefighter and do something about those errors is professionalism."(b) Designation.--The portion of State Route 1008 in Fayetteville, Franklin County, is designated as the Fire Chief James W. Cutchall Memorial Highway.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the highway to traffic in both directions on the highway.Section 2. Repeals.Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate section 1.(2) Section 15 of the act of June 17, 2016 (P.L.342, No.46), is repealed.Section 3. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2598PN3519 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516